Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-229.01
County fair; additional tax levy; amount.

Pursuant to a request by an elected county fair board, the county board of any county may levy an additional levy of three and five-tenths cents on each one hundred dollars of taxable valuation, or any part thereof, for the purpose of capital construction on and renovation, repair, improvement, and maintenance of the county fairgrounds, over and above the operational tax levy authorized in section 2-229. Such levy shall not exceed the amount actually required for such work. In counties having a population of more than sixty thousand inhabitants but not more than three hundred fifty thousand inhabitants and also containing a city of the primary class, such additional levy or any part thereof may be levied for the purpose of capital construction on and renovation, repair, improvement, and maintenance of the county fairgrounds. The additional levy shall be subject to section 77-3443.

Laws 1999, LB 437, § 18.